Utah statutes.
70A-8-112.   Statute of frauds inapplicable.
A contract or modification of a contract for the sale or purchase of a
security is enforceable whether or not there is a writing signed or record
authenticated by a party against whom enforcement is sought, even if the
contract or modification is not capable of performance within one year of its
making.
